Montana, session 2025, HB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-2-113, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-113. Application fees. (1) (a) Except as provided in subsection (1)(b), when the department
determines a drawing is necessary prior to issuance of hunting licenses for any game species during a hunting
season, it shall collect a $5 per species application fee.
(b) The department shall collect the following per species special license application fees:
(i) moose--resident, $10; nonresident, $50;
(ii) mountain goat--resident, $10; nonresident, $50;
(iii) mountain sheep--resident, $10; nonresident, $50;
(iv) sandhill crane--resident, $10; nonresident, $50;
(v) swan--resident, $10; nonresident, $50;
(iv)(vi) wild buffalo or bison--resident, $10; nonresident, $50.
(2) (a) If a resident participates in the bonus point system adopted by the commission, the
department shall collect an additional application fee of $2 per species.
(b) If a nonresident participates in the bonus point system adopted by the commission, the
department shall collect an additional application fee of $20 per species.
(3) Application fees collected pursuant to this section must be deposited in the state special
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 146
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 146
revenue fund to the credit of the department as set forth in 87-1-601.
(4) The payment of an application fee confers no hunting rights or privileges.
(5) The commission may waive the provisions of subsection (1) when a drawing is required for a
special season under 87-1-304."
Section 2. Section 87-2-411, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-2-411. Migratory game bird, sandhill crane, and swan licenses -- fees -- disposition of
proceeds. (1) The fee for a resident to purchase the a migratory game bird license is $5.50 $10. The fee for a
nonresident to purchase the a migratory game bird license is $150.
(2) The fee for a resident to purchase a sandhill crane license is $10. The fee for a nonresident to
purchase a sandhill crane license is $75. A person who purchases a sandhill crane license must also purchase
a migratory game bird license.
(3) The fee for a resident to purchase a swan license is $10. The fee for a nonresident to purchase
a swan license is $75. A person who purchases a swan license must also purchase a migratory game bird
license.
(2)(4) Money received from the sale of migratory game bird, sandhill crane, and swan licenses must
be deposited in an account in the state special revenue fund for the use of the department and may be
expended only for the protection, conservation, and development of wetlands in Montana."
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective March 1, 2026.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 146
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 146, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 146
INTRODUCED BY G. PARRY, C. COCHRAN, E. TILLEMAN, T. FRANCE
AN ACT REVISING LICENSE FEES FOR MIGRATORY GAME BIRDS; CREATING FEES FOR SANDHILL
CRANE AND SWAN APPLICATIONS AND LICENSES; REVISING THE MIGRATORY GAME BIRD LICENSE
FEE; PROVIDING FOR FUNDS FROM SANDHILL CRANE AND SWAN LICENSE SALES TO BE DEPOSITED
IN THE DEPARTMENT SPECIAL REVENUE ACCOUNT; AMENDING SECTIONS 87-2-113 AND 87-2-411,
MCA; AND PROVIDING A DELAYED EFFECTIVE DATE.”